Nevada, session 83, SB65.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 244.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.163 1. The boards of county commissioners in their
respective counties may create by ordinance the office of the county
coroner, prescribe the qualifications and duties of the county
coroner and make appointments to the office.
2. Any coroner so appointed is governed by the ordinances
pertaining to such office which may be enacted by the board of
county commissioners, and the provisions of NRS 259.025, 259.045
and 259.150 to 259.180, inclusive [.] , and section 2 of this act.
3. The boards of county commissioners shall require that the
county coroner make a reasonable effort to notify a decedent’s next
of kin who is authorized to order the burial or cremation of the
human remains of the decedent pursuant to NRS 451.024 of the fact
of the decedent’s death without unreasonable delay.
4. For any offense relating to the violation or willful disregard
of such duties or trusts of office as may be specified by the
respective boards of county commissioners, all coroners holding
office by appointment pursuant to this section are subject to such
fines and criminal penalties, including misdemeanor penalties and
removal from office by indictment, accusation or otherwise, as the
ordinance prescribes. This subsection applies to all deputies, agents,
employees and other persons employed by or exercising the powers
and functions of the coroner.
Sec. 2. Chapter 259 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the final
report of a coroner for an investigation into the death of a person
conducted pursuant to NRS 259.050 or an ordinance enacted
pursuant to NRS 244.163 is a public record. Notwithstanding the
provisions of NRS 239.010 and the provisions of this chapter, a
coroner may:
(a) Redact or withhold from public disclosure any information,
record, document or material in the final report that is
confidential, privileged or unrelated to the cause and manner of
death of the decedent; and
(b) Withhold from public disclosure any record, document or
material related to a homicide or death where the manner of death
has not been determined until:
(1) The investigation of the coroner is complete;
(2) The investigation of a law enforcement agency is
complete; or
-
*SB65*

– 3 –
(3) The final disposition of a criminal case related to the
death of the decedent.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the following
records, documents and materials contained in the case file or
final report of a coroner for an investigation into the death of a
person conducted pursuant to NRS 259.050 or an ordinance
enacted pursuant to NRS 244.163 are confidential and not public
records:
(a) Photographs or video recordings of an autopsy, crime
scene, the scene of the death of a decedent, the location at which
an incident occurred that resulted in the death of a decedent or the
residence of a decedent;
(b) Postmortem imaging, including, without limitation, a
radiograph, ultrasound, computed tomography or magnetic
resonance imaging;
(c) Fingerprints;
(d) Documents with identifying information of a decedent;
(e) Biological specimens, including, without limitation, slides
prepared for a histological analysis;
(f) Incomplete or unfinished reports, including, without
limitation, any notes, dictations or diagrams;
(g) Notes of the coroner;
(h) Medical records obtained from a third party;
(i) Any records, documents or materials obtained by a
subpoena issued pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 259.050; and
(j) Any records, documents or materials of which the coroner
is not the custodian.
3. Nothing in subsection 2 prohibits a coroner from:
(a) Disclosing the records, documents and materials set forth
in subsection 2 in response to a lawfully issued subpoena or court
order;
(b) Releasing the final report of the coroner and the records,
documents and materials set forth in subsection 2 as authorized by
subsection 2 of NRS 259.045; or
(c) At the discretion of the coroner, releasing the records,
documents and materials set forth in subsection 2 for the purposes
of scientific research, educational training or any governmental
purpose.
4. As used in this section, “case file” includes, without
limitation, any materials obtained or created during an
investigation conducted by a coroner into the death of a person.
Sec. 3. NRS 259.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
259.010 1. Every county in this State constitutes a coroner’s
district, except a county where a coroner is appointed pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 244.163.
-
*SB65*

– 4 –
2. The provisions of this chapter, except NRS 259.025,
259.045, 259.047, 259.049, subsections 3 and 4 of NRS 259.050,
NRS 259.053 and 259.150 to 259.180, inclusive, and section 2 of
this act, do not apply to any county where a coroner is appointed
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 244.163.
Sec. 4. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
-
*SB65*

– 5 –
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
-
*SB65*

– 6 –
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 2 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
-
*SB65*

– 7 –
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB65*